Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 12.4. Special or Charter Party Carriers.

§§ 56-338.50 through 56-338.64.

Repealed by Acts 1995, cc. 744 and 803.

Cross references.

As to present provisions governing special or charter party carriers by boat, see §§

46.2-2099.21

and

46.2-2099.30

.

Editor’s note.

Section 56-338.58 was amended by Acts 1995, c. 124. At the direction of the Code Commission, this amendment was implemented in comparable former § 46.2-2308, enacted by Acts 1995, cc. 744 and 803.